Utah statutes.
48-1d-111.   Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

(1)  If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the division for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the district court to order:

(a)  the person to sign the record;

(b)  the person to deliver the record to the division for filing; or

(c)  the division to file the record unsigned.

(2)  If a petitioner under Subsection (1) is not the partnership or foreign limited liability partnership to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the partnership or foreign limited liability partnership a party to the action.

(3)  A record filed under Subsection (1)(c) is effective without being signed.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

